Washington statutes.
RCW 26.09.310

Provision of health care to minor—Immunity of health care provider.

No health care provider or facility, or their agent, shall be liable for damages in any civil action brought by a parent or guardian based only on a lack of the parent or guardian's consent for medical care of a minor child, if consent to the care has been given by a parent or guardian of the minor. The immunity provided by this section shall apply regardless of whether:

(1) The parents are married, unmarried, in a domestic partnership or not, or separated at the time of consent or treatment;

(2) The consenting parent is, or is not, a custodial parent of the minor;

(3) The giving of consent by a parent is, or is not, full performance of any agreement between the parents, or of any order or decree in any action entered pursuant to chapter 26.09 RCW;

(4) The action or suit is brought by or on behalf of the nonconsenting parent, the minor child, or any other person.

[ 2008 c 6 s 1022; 1989 c 377 s 1.]

NOTES:

Part headings not law—Severability—2008 c 6: See RCW 26.60.900 and 26.60.901.